Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5855.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5. (1) The uniform city utility users tax ordinance does not apply to a person or corporation as to whom or which it is beyond the power of the city to impose the tax provided for in the uniform city utility users tax ordinance. (2) For tax years beginning after December 31, 1996, a person or corporation, except a casino, is exempt from the tax imposed under this ordinance for public utility services provided in a renaissance zone to the extent and for the duration provided pursuant to the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2681 to 125.2696. As used in this subsection, "casino" means a casino or a parking lot, hotel, motel, or retail store owned or operated by a casino, an affiliate, or an affiliated company, regulated by this state pursuant to the Michigan gaming control and revenue act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.201 to 432.226. (3) For tax years beginning after December 31, 2004, a qualified start-up business is exempt from the tax imposed under this ordinance for the 12-month period beginning November 1 for each tax year in which all of the following occur: (a) The qualified start-up business applies for the exemption as provided in subsection (4). (b) The governing body of the city adopts a resolution approving the exemption as provided in subsection (5). (4) A qualified start-up business may claim the exemption under subsection (3) by filing an exemption affidavit claiming the exemption with the treasurer of the city that imposes the tax under this ordinance on a form prescribed by the city. The affidavit under this subsection shall be filed on or before September 1 of each year that a taxpayer claims the exemption under subsection (3) and shall include all of the following: (a) A statement that the qualified start-up business was eligible for and claimed the credit allowed under section 31a of the single business tax act, former 1975 PA 228 , MCL 208.31a, or section 415 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1415, in the tax year that ended immediately before the November 1 in which the exemption under subsection (3) will be claimed. (b) A copy of the qualified start-up business's annual return required under the single business tax act, former 1975 PA 228 , MCL 208.1 to 208.145, or the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1101 to 208.1601, 208.1519, for the year in which the credit was claimed under section 31a of the single business tax act, former 1975 PA 228 , MCL 208.31a, or section 415 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1415, upon which the exemption under subsection (3) is based. (c) A statement authorizing the department of treasury to release information contained in the qualified start-up business's annual return filed under the single business tax act, former 1975 PA 228 , MCL 208.1 to 208.145, or the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1101 to 208.1601, 208.1519, that pertains to the qualified start-up business credit claimed under section 31a of the single business tax act, former 1975 PA 228 , MCL 208.31a, or section 415 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1415, upon which an exemption under subsection (3) is based to the city. (5) An exemption under subsection (3) is not allowed unless the governing body of the city that collects the tax under this act adopts a resolution approving the exemption. Exemptions under subsection (3) shall must be approved at the last official meeting of the governing body of the city in September of each year. The resolution adopted by the governing body of the city may approve the exemption provided in subsection (3) for 1 or more of the qualified start-up businesses that claim the exemption under subsection (3) by filing an affidavit on or before September 1 as provided in subsection (4). (6) A qualified start-up business shall not receive the exemption under subsection (3) for more than a total of 5 tax years. A qualified start-up business may receive the exemption under subsection (3) in nonconsecutive tax years. (7) For tax years beginning after the effective date of the helping opportunity prosper everywhere (HOPE) zone act, a person or corporation, except a casino, is exempt from the tax imposed under this ordinance for public utility services provided in a HOPE zone to the extent and for the duration provided pursuant to the helping opportunity prosper everywhere (HOPE) zone act. (8) (7) As used in this section: , "qualified (a) "Casino" means a casino regulated by this state under the Michigan Gaming Control and Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.201 to 432.226, and all property associated or affiliated with the operation of a casino, including, but not limited to, a parking lot, hotel, motel, or retail store. (b) "Qualified start-up business" means that term as defined in section 31a of the single business tax act, former 1975 PA 228 , MCL 208.31a, or section 415 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1415. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01123'25) or House Bill No. 5852 (request no. H01123'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.